Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2542
Escaped convict; return; notify Supreme Court; fix date of execution.

If any person who has been convicted of a crime punishable by death, and sentenced to death, shall escape, and shall not be retaken before the time fixed for his or her execution, it shall be lawful for the Director of Correctional Services, or any sheriff or other officer or person, to rearrest such person and return him or her to the custody of the director, who shall thereupon notify the Supreme Court that such person has been returned to custody. Upon receipt of that notice, the Supreme Court shall then issue a warrant, fixing a date for the enforcement of the sentence which shall be delivered to the director. The date of execution shall be set no later than sixty days following the issuance of the warrant.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 27;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2542 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.